

magnifiCo SA Fundamental Company Report Including Financial, SWOT, Competitors and Industry Analysis




























Sales and support:
        +44 20 8123 2220 (UK)
        +1 732 587 5005 (US)
info@marketpublishers.com





Business & Finance

Retail






Retail


Consumer Goods


Food & Beverage







Industry

Chemicals

IT & Technology

Life Sciences

Services






Freight & Trucking
Air Freight
Freight & Trucking Company Reports
Rail Freight
Road Freight
Water Freight


Media & Entertainment
Casino and Gaming
Cinema & Theater
Magazine & Newspaper
Media Company Reports
Music
Social Media
Television & Radio


Food Service
Fast Food
Restaurants
Restaurants & Leisure Company Reports
Pub & Bar


Consumer Services
Education
Hotels
Legal Services
Logistics
Post & Courier
Recruitment
Rent
Sports & Fitness Center
Travel & Leisure
Other Services








About
Faq
 My Cart


 











Market Reports
Press-Releases
Events
About Us
Terms & Conditions
Customer FAQ




Market Research Reports

Services

Media & Entertainment

Media Company Reports





magnifiCo SA Fundamental Company Report Including Financial, SWOT, Competitors and Industry Analysis





Date:
August 1, 2017



Pages:
50


Price:




US$ 499.00








 magnifiCo SA Fundamental Company Report Including Financial, SWOT, Competitors and Industry Analysis







Enhanced SWOT Analysis (+ US$ 75.00)








PESTEL Analysis (+ US$ 150.00)








IFE, EFE, IE Matrices (+ US$ 125.00)








Porter Five Forces Analysis (+ US$ 75.00)








VRIO Analysis (+ US$ 75.00)








Special Bundle, including all types of analyses (+ US$ 400.00)You save US$ 100.00



Publisher:
BAC Reports


Report type:
Strategic Report


Delivery:

E-mail Delivery - PDF (on default), Hard Copy Mail Delivery (+US$ 190.00)



ID:
MEB5D15AA87BEN



        Leaflet:
    

Download PDF Leaflet






















Abstracts
Contents
Analysis Features





magnifiCo SA Fundamental Company Report provides a complete overview of the company’s affairs. All available data is presented in a comprehensive and easily accessed format. The report includes financial and SWOT information, industry analysis, opinions, estimates, plus annual and quarterly forecasts made by stock market experts. The report also enables direct comparison to be made between magnifiCo SA and its competitors. This provides our Clients with a clear understanding of magnifiCo SA position in the  Media Industry.  


The report contains detailed information about magnifiCo SA that gives an unrivalled in-depth knowledge about internal business-environment of the company: data about the owners, senior executives, locations, subsidiaries, markets, products, and company history. 
Another part of the report is a SWOT-analysis carried out for  magnifiCo SA. It involves specifying the objective of the company's business and identifies the different factors that are favorable and unfavorable to achieving that objective. SWOT-analysis helps to understand company’s strengths, weaknesses, opportunities, and possible threats against it. 
The magnifiCo SA financial analysis covers the income statement and ratio trend-charts with balance sheets and cash flows presented on an annual and quarterly basis.  The report outlines the main financial ratios pertaining to profitability, margin analysis, asset turnover, credit ratios, and company’s long-term solvency. This sort of company's information will assist and strengthen your company’s decision-making processes.  
In the part that describes magnifiCo SA competitors and the industry in whole, the information about company's financial ratios is compared to those of its competitors and to the industry. The unique analysis of the market and company’s competitors along with detailed information about the internal and external factors affecting the relevant industry will help to manage your business environment. Your company’s business and sales activities will be boosted by gaining an insight into your competitors’ businesses. 
Also the report provides relevant news, an analysis of PR-activity, and stock price movements. The latter are correlated with pertinent news and press releases, and annual and quarterly forecasts are given by a variety of experts and market research firms. Such information creates your awareness about principal trends of magnifiCo SA business. 


About magnifiCo SA
magnifiCo SA provides public relations and marketing services. Its public relations services include product/brand, corporate, and crisis public relations, as well as investor relations. The company also prepares and organizes mass events, concerts, and happenings; press and scientific conferences; training sessions and congresses; road shows; and product launching, promotional, extraordinary consumer communication, effective sampling, sales animation and promotion, mystery shopping, casual, and team-building events, as well as production and installation of POSM. In addition, it offers design and creation services, such as copywriting and graphic design projects, advertising and TV spots scriptwriting, TV and radio spots production, corporate identity preparation, and casting and other production-related activities. The company serves companies in gastronomy, FMCG, fashion, publishing, home, marketing, art, IT and telecom, energy, construction and agriculture, malls and developers, finance, beauty, pharma, tourism, and charity industries in Poland and internationally. magnifiCo SA is based in Warsaw, Poland.
The above Company Fundamental Report is a half-ready report and contents are subject to change. 
It means that we have all necessary data in our database to prepare the report but need 2-3 days to complete it. During this time we are also updating the report with respect to the current moment. So, you can get all the most recent data available for the same price. Please note that preparation of additional types of analyses requires extra time.




RESEARCH METHODOLOGY	
DISCLAIMER	
1. MAGNIFICO SA COMPANY PROFILE
1.1. Key facts
1.2. Financial Performance	
1.3. Key Executives	
1.4. Ownership and Major Holders	
1.5. Company History	
2. MAGNIFICO SA BUSINESS OVERVIEW
2.1. Business Description	
2.2. Major Products and Services	
2.3. Markets and Sales Activities
2.4. Locations, Subsidiaries, Operating Units
3. MAGNIFICO SA SWOT ANALYSIS
3.1. Overview
3.2. Strengths
3.3. Weaknesses
3.4. Opportunities
3.5. Threats
4. MAGNIFICO SA FINANCIAL ANALYSIS
4.1. Financial Statements
  4.1.1. Income Statement
  4.1.2. Balance Sheet
  4.1.3. Cash Flow
4.2. Financial Ratios
  4.2.1. Profitability
  4.2.2. Margin Analysis
  4.2.3. Asset Turnover
  4.2.4. Credit Ratios
  4.2.5. Long-Term Solvency
  4.2.6. Growth Over Prior Year
  4.2.7. Financial Ratios Charts
4.3. Stock Market Snapshot
5. MAGNIFICO SA COMPETITORS AND INDUSTRY ANALYSIS
5.1. magnifiCo SA Direct Competitors
5.2. Comparison of magnifiCo SA and Direct Competitors Financial Ratios
5.3. Comparison of magnifiCo SA and Direct Competitors Stock Charts
5.4. magnifiCo SA Industry Analysis
  5.4.1. Media Industry Snapshot
  5.4.2. magnifiCo SA Industry Position Analysis
6. MAGNIFICO SA NEWS & EVENTS
6.1. News & PR Activity Analysis
6.2. IR Corporate News
6.3. Marketing News
6.4. Corporate Events
7. MAGNIFICO SA EXPERTS REVIEW1
7.1. Experts Opinion
7.2. Experts Estimates
8. MAGNIFICO SA ENHANCED SWOT ANALYSIS2
9. POLAND PESTEL ANALYSIS2
9.1. Political Factors
9.2. Economic Factors
9.3. Social Factors
9.4. Technological Factors
9.5. Environmental Factors
9.6. Legal Factors
10. MAGNIFICO SA  IFE, EFE, IE MATRICES2
10.1. Internal Factor Evaluation Matrix
10.2. External Factor Evaluation Matrix
10.3. Internal External Matrix
11. MAGNIFICO SA PORTER FIVE FORCES ANALYSIS2
12. MAGNIFICO SA VRIO ANALYSIS2

APPENDIX: RATIO DEFINITIONS

LIST OF TABLES
magnifiCo SA Key Facts
Profitability
Management Effectiveness
Income Statement Key Figures
Balance Sheet Key Figures
Cash Flow Statement Key Figures
Financial Performance Abbreviation Guide
magnifiCo SA Key Executives
Key Executives Biographies1
Key Executives Compensations1
magnifiCo SA Major Shareholders
magnifiCo SA History	
magnifiCo SA Products
Revenues by Segment 
Revenues by Region	
magnifiCo SA Offices and Representations
magnifiCo SA SWOT Analysis
Yearly Income Statement Including Trends 
Income Statement Latest 4 Quarters Including Trends 
Yearly Balance Sheet Including Trends 
Balance Sheet Latest 4 Quarters Including Trends 
Yearly Cash Flow Including Trends 
Cash Flow Latest 4 Quarters Including Trends 
magnifiCo SA Profitability Ratios
Margin Analysis Ratios
Asset Turnover Ratios
Credit Ratios 
Long-Term Solvency Ratios
Financial Ratios Growth Over Prior Year
magnifiCo SA Capital Market Snapshot
magnifiCo SA Direct Competitors Key Facts
Direct Competitors Profitability Ratios
Direct Competitors Margin Analysis Ratios
Direct Competitors Asset Turnover Ratios
Direct Competitors Credit Ratios
Direct Competitors Long-Term Solvency Ratios
Media Industry Statistics
magnifiCo SA Industry Position
Company vs. Industry Income Statement Analysis
Company vs. Industry Balance Sheet Analysis
Company vs. Industry Cash Flow Analysis
Company vs. Industry Ratios Comparison
magnifiCo SA Consensus Recommendations1
Analyst Recommendation Summary1
Price Target Summary1
Experts Recommendation Trends1
Revenue Estimates Analysis1
Earnings Estimates Analysis1
Historical Surprises1
Revenue Estimates Trend1
Earnings Estimates Trend1
Revenue Revisions1
LIST OF FIGURES
magnifiCo SA Annual Revenues in Comparison with Cost of Goods Sold and Gross Profit
Profit Margin Chart
Operating Margin Chart
Return on Equity (ROE) Chart
Return on Assets (ROA) Chart
Debt to Equity Chart
Current Ratio Chart
magnifiCo SA 1-year Stock Charts
magnifiCo SA 5-year Stock Charts
magnifiCo SA vs. Main Indexes 1-year Stock Chart
magnifiCo SA vs. Direct Competitors 1-year Stock Charts
magnifiCo SA Article Density Chart
1 – Data availability depends on company’s security policy. 
2 – These sections are available only when you purchase a report with appropriate additional types of analyses. 
The complete financial data is available for publicly traded companies.

SWOT Analysis
SWOT, which stands for Strengths, Weaknesses, Opportunities and Threats, is an analytical framework that identifies the internal and external factors that are favorable and unfavorable for a company.

Enhanced SWOT Analysis
Enhanced SWOT is a 3×3 grid that arranges strengths, weaknesses, opportunities and threats into one scheme:

How to use the strengths to take advantage of the opportunities?
How to use the strengths to reduce likelihood and impact of the threats?
How to overcome the weaknesses that obstruct taking advantage of the opportunities? 
How to overcome the weaknesses that can make the threats a reality?

Upon answering these questions a company can develop a project plan to improve its business performance.

PESTEL Analysis
PESTEL (also termed as PESTLE) is an ideal tool to strategically analyze what influence different outside factors – political, economic, sociocultural, technological, environmental and legal – exert on a business to later chart its long term targets.
Being part of the external analysis when carrying out a strategic assessment or performing a market study, PESTEL gives an overview of diverse macro-environmental factors that any company should thoughtfully consider. By perceiving these outside environments, businesses can maximally benefit from the opportunities while minimizing the threats to the organization.
Key Factors Examined by PESTEL Analysis:

Political – What opportunities and pressures are brought by political bodies and what is the degree of public regulations’ impact on the business?
Economic – What economic policies, trends and structures are expected to affect the organization, what is this influence’s degree?
Sociological – What cultural and societal aspects will work upon the demand for the business’s products and operations?
Technological – What impact do the technological aspects, innovations, incentives and barriers have on the organization?
Environmental – What environmental and ecological facets, both locally and farther afield, are likely to predetermine the business?
Legal – What laws and legislation will exert influence on the style the business is carried out?


IFE, EFE, IE Matrices
The Internal Factor Evaluation matrix (IFE matrix) is a strategic management tool helping audit or evaluate major weaknesses and strengths in a business’s functional areas. In addition, IFE matrix serves as a basis for identifying and assessing relationships amongst those areas. The IFE matrix is utilised in strategy formulation.
The External Factor Evaluation matrix (EFE matrix) is a tool of strategic management that is typically utilised to assess current market conditions. It is an ideal instrument for visualising and prioritising the threats and opportunities a firm is facing.
The essential difference between the above mentioned matrices lies in the type of factors incorporated in the model; whilst the latter is engaged in internal factors, the former deals exceptionally with external factors – those exposed to social, political, economic, legal, etc. external forces. 
Being a continuation of the EFE matrix and IFE matrix models, the Internal External matrix (IE matrix) rests upon an investigation of external and internal business factors integrated into one suggestive model. 

Porter Five Forces Analysis
The Porter’s five forces analysis studies the industry of operation and helps the company find new sources of competitive advantage. The analysis surveys an industry through five major questions:

What composes a threat of substitute products and services?
Is there a threat of new competitors entering the market?
What is the intensity of competitive rivalry?
How big is the bargaining power of buyers?
How significant is the bargaining power of suppliers?


VRIO Analysis
VRIO stands for Value, Rarity, Imitability, Organization. This analysis helps to evaluate all company’s resources and capabilities and bring them together into one aggregate table that includes:

Tangible resources
Financial
Physical
Technological
Organizational

Intangible resources
Human
Innovation and Creativity
Reputation

Organizational capabilities

The result of the analysis gives a clear picture of company’s competitive and economic implications, answering the questions if the resources mentioned above are:

Valuable?
Rare? 
Costly to imitate? 
Organized properly? 

Skip to top




MORE PUBLICATIONS


AT & S Austria Technologie & Systemtechnik AG Fundamental Company Report Including Financial, SWOT, Competitors and Industry Analysis
US$ 499.00
Aug, 2017 · 50 pages


Iberian Minerals Corp. Fundamental Company Report Including Financial, SWOT, Competitors and Industry Analysis
US$ 499.00
Aug, 2017 · 50 pages


Asia Development (EDBM) Ltd Fundamental Company Report Including Financial, SWOT, Competitors and Industry Analysis
US$ 499.00
Aug, 2017 · 50 pages


Sony Corporation Fundamental Company Report Including Financial, SWOT, Competitors and Industry Analysis
US$ 499.00
Aug, 2017 · 50 pages


Sichuan Jiuzhou Electric Co., Ltd. Fundamental Company Report Including Financial, SWOT, Competitors and Industry Analysis
US$ 499.00
Aug, 2017 · 50 pages








Ask Your Question
magnifiCo SA Fundamental Company Report Including Financial, SWOT, Competitors and Industry Analysis







Company name*:



Contact person*:



Phone/fax*:



Email*:




 Request invoice


Your enquiry:




				Please click on a Check Box below to confirm you are not a robot:
					


























Market Reports


All Categories  Consumer Services Education Food Service Fast Food Restaurants Restaurants & Leisure Company Reports Pub & Bar  Freight & Trucking Air Freight Freight & Trucking Company Reports Rail Freight Road Freight Water Freight  Hotels Legal Services Logistics Post & Courier Recruitment Rental Sports & Fitness Center Travel & Leisure Media & Entertainment Casino and Gaming Cinema & Theater Magazine & Newspaper Media Company Reports Music Social Media Television & Radio  Utilities Company Reports Other Services 












Sales and support:
                    +44 20 8123 2220
            +1 732 587 5005
info@marketpublishers.com
  © 2006-2016 MarketPublishers.com


About Us
Our Clients
Our Publishers
Customer FAQ


Market Reports
New Publications
Reports by Regions
Press-Releases


Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy
Return Policy
Affiliate Program


Join as Publisher

Follow Us:

























Media Company Research Reports


























Sales and support:
        +44 20 8123 2220 (UK)
        +1 732 587 5005 (US)
info@marketpublishers.com





Business & Finance






Finance Services
Banking
Cards
Credit & Loans
Financial Company Reports
Investment
Mortgage
Payment
Other Financial Services


Insurance
General Insurance
Health Insurance
Insurance Company Reports
Life Insurance
Property Insurance
Reinsurance
Auto Insurance


Business Services
Accounting & Tax Services
Advertising
Brokerage
Business Support
Business Services Company Reports
Consulting
Diversified Services Company Reports
Franchise
Wealth Management


Company Reports
Business Survey
Real Estate





Retail






Retail
Cash & Carry
Convenience Stores
Department Stores
Duty Free
Hypermarkets & Supermarkets
Online Retail
Retail Company Reports
Service Station Retail
Specialist Store
Wholesale 

Consumer Goods
Consumer Products Company Reports
Cosmetics & Hygiene Products
Furnishing
Jewelry & Accessories
Household Products
Pet Products
Sporting Goods & Equipment
Stationery
Textile & Leather
Tobacco
Toys & Games 

Food & Beverage
Alcoholic Drinks
Soft Drinks
Food
Food & Beverage Company Reports







Industry






Agriculture
Agribusiness
Agricultural Products
Animal Husbandry
Fisheries
Fertilizers
Gardening & Forestry

Construction
Building Materials
Building Products Company Reports
Commercial Construction
Engineering & Construction Services Company Report
Industrial construction
Infrastructure
Residential Construction


Energy
Alternative Energy
Batteries & Accumulators
Electric Power
Energy Company Reports
Nuclear Power
Smart Grid
Thermal Power

Metallurgy
Alkali Metals
Ferrous Metallurgy
Metal Alloys
Metal products
Metals & Mining Company Reports
Non-Ferrous Metallurgy
Precious Metals
Rare-Earth Metals
Uranous Metals (Actinoid)


Mineral Raw Materials
Building Raw Materials & Fillers
Conglomerates Company Reports
Fossil Fuel
Nonmetallic Minerals
Metalloids
Ores
Precious & Semi-Precious Stones


Machinery & Equipment
Defence & Security
Packaging Industry
Publishing Industry
Pulp & Paper
Vehicle
Other Industries






Chemicals






Organic Chemicals
Alcohols
Alkenes (Olefins)
Ethers
Organic Acids & Derivatives
Aldehydes & Ketones
Amines
Halogenated
Polymers
Alkanes
Benzene & Derivatives
Isocyanates


Inorganic Chemicals
Alkali
Inorganic Salts
Non-Metallic Oxides
Inorganic Acids
Metal Oxides


Chemical Company Reports
Chemical Reports by CAS Number
Composite Materials
Oils & Lubricants






IT & Technology






Consumer Electronics
Audio & Video Equipment
GPS Navigation
Mobile Phones & Smartphones
PC & Notebooks
Photography


Hardware
Computer Hardware
Computers & Electronic Equipment Company Reports
Data Storage
Networking Hardware


Software
Application Software
Operating System
Programming Software
Software Development
Software & Technology Services Company Reports
Video Games


Telecommunications
Broadband
Communication Services Company Reports
Internet
Mobile
Networks
Telecom Equipment
Wireless Technology






Life Sciences






Medical Devices
Anesthesia & Respiratory
Cardiovascular Devices
Dental
Diabetes Care
Diagnostic Equipment
Drug Delivery
Endoscopy
Ear, Nose & Throat (ENT)
Healthcare Equipment/Supplies Company Reports
Implants
Neurology
Orthopedic
Ophthalmic
Surgical Equipment
Wound Closure
Other Medical Devices


Biotechnology
Biomarkers
Biomaterials
Biosimilars
Stem Cell

Diagnostics & Diseases
In Vitro Diagnostics
Incontinence
Cancer
Cardiovascular
Diabetes
Hepatitis


Healthcare
Healthcare Services Company Reports
Ear Care
Eye Care
Hospital
Medicated Skin Care
Therapy
Wound Care


Pharmaceuticals
Clinical Trial
Drug Stores
Drugs
Pharmaceuticals Company Reports
Vaccines

Medical Products
Veterinary






Services






Freight & Trucking
Air Freight
Freight & Trucking Company Reports
Rail Freight
Road Freight
Water Freight


Media & Entertainment
Casino and Gaming
Cinema & Theater
Magazine & Newspaper
Media Company Reports
Music
Social Media
Television & Radio


Food Service
Fast Food
Restaurants
Restaurants & Leisure Company Reports
Pub & Bar


Consumer Services
Education
Hotels
Legal Services
Logistics
Post & Courier
Recruitment
Rent
Sports & Fitness Center
Travel & Leisure
Other Services








About
Faq
 My Cart


 











Market Reports
Press-Releases
Events
About Us
Terms & Conditions
Customer FAQ




Market Research Reports

Services

Media & Entertainment

Media Company Reports








Media Company Research Reports


Companies in the Media (or ‘mass media’) industry are involved in multiple activities in the areas such as broadcast media (radio and TV), publishing (printing), recordings (audio cassettes, CDs, DVDs, etc.), movies, digital media (the Net and cellular phones), and others, aimed at reaching the majority of mass audience.
The Media world witnessed formidable growth throughout the former ten years thanks to the technology breakthroughs in the broadcasting and printing sectors, evoked by the elevated significance of modifying media usage patterns. By end-2017, the market is anticipated to crawl to a world value of nearly EUR 958 billion. North America, steered by the U.S., is the globe’s largest, though a slow-growing, marketplace. The global media space is chaired by such giants as Comcast Corporation, Time Warner, News Corporation, Google, and Walt Disney. 
This Catalogue embeds the research reports casting light on the opportunities and hardships facing Media Companies worldwide. The research reports discuss the companies’ geographical footprints; provide their competitive benchmarking, financial statements, SWOT analyses, products’ positioning, marketing tactics, and corporate strategies. Highlights of Media Companies’ income levels, ad spending, as well as of governmental incentives are featured in the research reports too.





All Regions
Global
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                        

Media Company Reports


All Publishers BAC Industry Comparative Analysis
                        BAC SWOT Company Reports
                        datamining
                        GlobalData
                        Omi Advisories
                    



                            Found
                                 2581 publications                    



Zurvita Holdings, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zurvita Holdings, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


ZoomerMedia Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
ZoomerMedia Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


ZON Multimedia Servicos de Telecomunicacoes e Multimedia SGPS SA - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
ZON Multimedia Servicos de Telecomunicacoes e Multimedia SGPS SA - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Zinkia Entertainment SA - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zinkia Entertainment SA - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Zhejiang Huace Film & TV Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zhejiang Huace Film & TV Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Zenrin Co. Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zenrin Co. Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Zee News Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zee News Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Zee Entertainment Enterprises Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zee Entertainment Enterprises Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Z3 Enterprises Inc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Z3 Enterprises Inc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


YTN - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
YTN - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Your Family Entertainment AG - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Your Family Entertainment AG - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Young Broadcasting, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Young Broadcasting, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


YouBlast Global, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
YouBlast Global, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Global Yellow Pages Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Global Yellow Pages Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Yellow Media Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Yellow Media Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Yell Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Yell Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Yedang Company Co.,Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Yedang Company Co.,Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


YeaRimDang Publishing Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
YeaRimDang Publishing Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


XNE, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
XNE, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


XK Tegopoulos Editions SA - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
XK Tegopoulos Editions SA - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Xinhua Sports & Entertainment Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Xinhua Sports & Entertainment Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Xinhua Finance Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Xinhua Finance Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Xing Lin Medical Information Technology Company Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Xing Lin Medical Information Technology Company Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Xilam Animation - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Xilam Animation - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Xanadoo Company - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Xanadoo Company - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


XA Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
XA Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Writers' Group Film Corp - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Writers' Group Film Corp - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


World Wrestling Entertainment Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
World Wrestling Entertainment Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


WPP plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
WPP plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wowow Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wowow Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Works Media Group (The) PLC - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Works Media Group (The) PLC - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Work Point Entertainment plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Work Point Entertainment plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Woongjin Thinkbig Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Woongjin Thinkbig Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Woongjin Holdings Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Woongjin Holdings Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wolters Kluwer NV - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wolters Kluwer NV - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


WLMG Holding Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
WLMG Holding Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wire and Wireless India Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wire and Wireless India Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wilmington Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wilmington Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


William H. Sadlier, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
William H. Sadlier, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wige Media AG - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wige Media AG - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wi-Fi TV, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wi-Fi TV, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


WFCA plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
WFCA plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Westwood One Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Westwood One Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


West Australian Newspapers Holdings Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
West Australian Newspapers Holdings Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wellmade STAR M Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wellmade STAR M Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wedge Holdings Co. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wedge Holdings Co. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Weborama - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Weborama - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Web Media Group Ad - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Web Media Group Ad - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wave Entertainment PCL - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wave Entertainment PCL - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Watford Leisure plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Watford Leisure plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages




1
2
3
4
5
>

Skip to top





Market Reports


All Categories  Consumer Services Education Food Service Fast Food Restaurants Restaurants & Leisure Company Reports Pub & Bar  Freight & Trucking Air Freight Freight & Trucking Company Reports Rail Freight Road Freight Water Freight  Hotels Legal Services Logistics Post & Courier Recruitment Rental Sports & Fitness Center Travel & Leisure Media & Entertainment Casino and Gaming Cinema & Theater Magazine & Newspaper Media Company Reports Music Social Media Television & Radio  Utilities Company Reports Other Services 






Need Help?

								+44 20 8123 2220 (UK)
				+1 732 587 5005 (USA)
info@marketpublishers.com







Sales and support:
                    +44 20 8123 2220
            +1 732 587 5005
info@marketpublishers.com
  © 2006-2016 MarketPublishers.com


About Us
Our Clients
Our Publishers
Customer FAQ


Market Reports
New Publications
Reports by Regions
Press-Releases


Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy
Return Policy
Affiliate Program


Join as Publisher

Follow Us:























MAGNIFICO pasta products,Philippines MAGNIFICO pasta supplier














Make 21food.com your home page | Add to   Favorites

Sign In | Join Now | Posting Buying   Leads | Help |

















Home
Suppliers
For Sellers
For Buyers 
Tradeshow
News
My 21Food






Aquatic Product  |
            
            Canned Food  |
            
            Machinery  |
            
            


Agricultural Product 


Fruit & Vegetable 


Ingredients & Additives 


Grain & Cereal 


Wine & Beverage 
















          Products


          Sell


          Buy


          Companies









Select Country/Region














	You are here: Home > 
	
	Products > Noodles & Pasta > Pasta







Add to My 
Favorites


MAGNIFICO pasta

Category: Pasta
Keywords: 

Place of Orign: 

Contact:Mr.Mr. Sir or Madam






Supplier Details

GMC
 Philippines 
Contact:Mr.Mr. Sir or Madam
Tel:63-63917 8208-
Total Annual Sales Volume:
Number of Employees:
Business Type:Trading Company  
Main Markets:

View the Seller's Store





Product Details
Company Profile


Item specifics


Product Name:
          MAGNIFICO pasta
        

Details


magnifico pasta is the brand of choice among smart homemakers
who want high quality


magnifico pasta is the brand of choice among smart homemakers
who want high quality at a reasonable price. with magnifico
manigurado sa presyo! manigurado sa kalidad! is the preferred brand
of wet market business owners 



product type:
pasta









This company's About Us section is not currently available.
Basic Information

Business Type:Trading Company  
Product/Service (We Sell):YEAST AND BAKING POWDER
Number of Employees:
Main Markets: 
Total Annual Sales Volume: 
Factory Location: ,   , Philippines 









Send message to this supplier







Mr.Mr. Sir or MadamView the Seller's 
      Store
Enter your Message here
- Enter between 20 to 3,000 
      characters. English only.
Your message must be between 
      20-2000 characters.English only.






Related Products










Magnifico Giornata Ginger Peche 
Place of Orign:France 
     Magnifico Giornata's Ginger Peche essence.  
       Available in either the 750ml size or the smaller 375ml size.      ...










Magnifico Giornata Lavender Honey 
Place of Orign:France 
     Magnifico Giornata's Lavender HONEY essence.       
  		       
  			       
  	       
  											       
  					...










Magnifico Cacio di Pienza 150G 
Place of Orign:Italy 
     il Nonno Casaro Magnifico Cacio di Pienza 150G       
  		       
  		     This  Cheese  is produced with sheep's milk and ...










Magnifico Giornata Deluxe Gift Box 
Place of Orign:France 
     Magnifico Giornata Deluxe Gift box. Includes 3 - 750ml bottles of our Infused Essence Collection and 2 custom champagne glass...










Magnifico Giornata Champagne/Sparkling Wine 
Place of Orign:France 
     Magnifico Giornata is "Not Your Ordinary Champagne". Infused Essence Collection - Lavender Honey,  Grapefruit  Blan...










Magnifico Giornata 1 Bottle Gift Box 
Place of Orign:France 
     Magnifico Gift Box with 2 custom champagne glasses. Includes 1 bottle of  Lavender Honey, Ginger Peche or  Grapefruit  Blanc ...










Pasta 
Place of Orign:cc 
 we are looking for a capable supplier of any of the abovelisted Items for  a monthly contract supplies.Please We'll like to have ...










Pasta 
Place of Orign:Hongkong,China 
Pasta










Pasta 
Place of Orign:china 
We are manufacturers and exporters of specially soybean pasta and other soybean products.  We use the whole soybean to make our ...






Related Searches:

Pasta,							

 Noodles & Pasta,							

 noodles pasta,							

 pasta noodles,							

 pasta noodle,							


View all



Pasta,							

    Noodles & Pasta,							

    noodles pasta,							

    pasta noodles,							

    pasta noodle,							

    pasta manufacturing,							

    pasta manufacturers,							

    pasta price,							

    instant pasta,							

    pasta food,							

    wholesale pasta,							

    rice pasta,							

    konjac pasta,							

    wheat pasta,							

    spaghetti pasta
View less



Browse Hot Product By Alphabetically:
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z



Email this page
 
Bookmark this page







About 21Food | 
      Premium Membership | 
      Terms of Service | 
      Privacy Policy | 
      Advertisement | 
      
      Contact us | 
      Site Map










Products
Selling Leads
Buying Leads
Companies









    
    
	Copyright 2002-2017 Food & Beverage Online. All rights reserved.   ICP NO.:Zhe B2-20090288-2


 













Salon System - Multi-brand Hairdressing and Beauty Distributor


































			TRADE ONLY
		






HOME
ABOUT US
OUR PRODUCTS

Anstia
Avacare
Blondi Bleach
Contessa
Just Wax
Lashes and Nails
Logic
New Wave
Peroxide
Sculptured
Soft
Thai Manicure


LICENSED PRODUCTS

Fudge
InterCosmo
Indola
Kadus
L'Oréal Matrix
Lakmé
Leyton House
Nisim
Nioxin
Paul Mitchell
Wella



CONTACT US











			WELCOME





Salon System Pty (Ltd) is the leading multi-brand hairdressing and beauty distributor in South Africa. Having 50 years experience and the best qualified staff on hand puts us at the top of our game.
We stock the largest professional product range of the industry’s best all under one roof. From Fudge, Intercosmo, Indola, Lakmé , L'Oréal, Paul Mitchell, Wella and Voila to name but a few as well as our own in house brand, Salon System. 
Although we have a very large customer base covering over 11000 hair salons nationwide no hairdressing salon, be it a small salon or a salon in a major shopping centre, is too big or too small for us to service. We pride ourselves on going the extra mile for our customers, whether it is with the free delivery service we offer or the smile on the sales assistant in one of our cash and carry showrooms.
With our head office in Diep River, Cape Town, and seven other branches based in all major business centres countrywide we are accessible to hairdressers throughout the whole of South Africa. 









Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy
Contact Us




				Copyright © 2010 Salon System South Africa. All rights reserved.

















Luigi Bormioli South Africa - Yuppiechef



















 





 


 

 













Search







 Cart 0




Your cart is empty
Find something that will inspire you to get into the kitchen.







Free delivery in SA* 

Change country
Free delivery*
Change currency



















Luigi Bormioli


 Back to                 Brands
             




Popularity
Rating
Price (Lowest)
Price (Highest)
Latest
Most Wishlisted
Most Gifted



 
 





Set of 4









This product has not been reviewed yet.



Luigi Bormioli
Sublime Tumblers, Set of 4





R289






 






Set of 2









This product has not been reviewed yet.



Luigi Bormioli
Thermic Cappuccino Cup & Saucer, Set of 2





R349






 













This product has not been reviewed yet.



Luigi Bormioli
Optima Glass Oil and Vinegar Bottles





R109






 
 












5 out of 5 stars from 1 reviews



Luigi Bormioli
Optima Hydrosommelier Glass Bottle, 1 Litre





R139






 






Set of 4









4.5 out of 5 stars from 3 reviews



Luigi Bormioli
Magnifico Flutes, Set of 4





R509






 






Set of 2









This product has not been reviewed yet.



Luigi Bormioli
Thermic Mugs, Set of 2





R349






 
 












This product has not been reviewed yet.



Luigi Bormioli
Michaelangelo Masterpiece Glass Jug





                                                                                            From                                     R449






 













This product has not been reviewed yet.



Luigi Bormioli
Lock Eat Food Jar





                                                                                            From                                     R99






 






Set of 4









5 out of 5 stars from 2 reviews



Luigi Bormioli
Magnifico Red Wine Glasses, Set of 4





                                                                                            From                                     R519






 
 





Set of 4









This product has not been reviewed yet.



Luigi Bormioli
Sublime Saucer Champagne Glasses, Set of 4





R459






 













This product has not been reviewed yet.



Luigi Bormioli
Sublime Set, Set of 5





R489






 






Set of 4









This product has not been reviewed yet.



Luigi Bormioli
Magnifico White Wine Glasses, Set of 4





R499






 
 





Set of 6









This product has not been reviewed yet.



Luigi Bormioli
Bach Highball Glasses, Set of 6





R589






 






Set of 4









This product has not been reviewed yet.



Luigi Bormioli
Bach White Wine Glasses, Set of 4





R479






 






Set of 4









This product has not been reviewed yet.



Luigi Bormioli
Magnifico Extra Large Wine Glasses, Set of 4





R479






 
 





Set of 2









This product has not been reviewed yet.



Luigi Bormioli
Vinea Stemless Wine Glasses, Set of 2





R179






 






Case of 4









This product has not been reviewed yet.



Luigi Bormioli
Sublime White Wine Glasses, Set of 4





R369






 






Set of 4









5 out of 5 stars from 1 reviews



Luigi Bormioli
Bach Champagne Flutes, Set of 4





R459






 
 












5 out of 5 stars from 1 reviews



Luigi Bormioli
Sublime Carafe with Cork Stopper, 1 Litre





R249






 






Set of 6









This product has not been reviewed yet.



Luigi Bormioli
Birrateque IPA Glasses, Set of 6





R579






 






Set of 2









5 out of 5 stars from 4 reviews



Luigi Bormioli
Thermic Glass Tumblers, Set of 2





                                                                                            From                                     R319






 
  






 










We're proud to offer free delivery on all orders over R300, to any destination in South Africa. On small baskets under R300, we offer standard delivery in 3 to 5 working days at a cost of just R45.
When you place an order on this site you will be asked for a physical address that is normally occupied during office hours. For very remote areas not serviced by our normal couriers we will have to deliver via Post Office, or to the nearest town to you that is accessible.






We only deliver gift registry purchases to addresses in South Africa. You can purchase gifts off a registry, but you will not be able to set one up.
Need help? Contact hello@yuppiechef.com


We only deliver gift registry purchases to addresses in South Africa.
Need help? Contact hello@yuppiechef.com















Commercial Credit Report for magnifiCo SA - Report Preview
















































CreditRiskMonitor helps corporate credit, procurement and finance professionals stay ahead of financial risk with comprehensive commercial credit reports, risk analysis and monitoring for more than 57,000 active, publicly-traded companies worldwide. 
                                    Reports typically include detailed financial statements, ratios, peer analyses, bond agency ratings from Moody's, S&P and Fitch, when available, and our proprietary FRISK® score, proven 96% accurate in predicting financial failure of public companies. Below is a partial preview of the CreditRiskMonitor report for magnifiCo SA.
                                To get the full report on this and other companies at no charge, request a personal demo and free trial.
                                
                                To purchase this report now, or if you are a subscriber, click here.







magnifiCo SA



ul. Wa Miedzeszyski 608a


Phone: (+48) 609 776 612p:+48 609 776 612
Warszawa, 03-988  Poland









            This company is no longer actively traded on any major stock exchange.
          






Business Summary




magnifiCo SA is a Poland-based public relations agency. The Company provides a range of public relations (PR) and marketing services, including product and brand PR, company PR, crisis PR, as well as media and investor relations. The Company also offers organization and preparation of mass events, concerts and happenings, press and scientific conferences, training sessions and congresses, product launching, promotional and casual events, consumer communication, sampling and road shows, among others. In addition, magnifiCo SA provides such design and creation services as copywriting and graphic design of projects, advertising and television (TV) spots scriptwriting, TV and radio spots production, corporate identity preparation, as well as casting and other production-related activities, among others.


Scores and Ratings




FRISK®Score
Z''Score
IRA CQScore
DBTIndex
S&PRating
Moody'sRating
FitchRating

-Yes-----


Financials, News and Filings




LatestStatement
LastAudit
News
SECFilings
BankruptcyFilings
Suit &JudgmentFilings
TaxLienFilings

3/31/201612/31/2015Yes----


Industries



SIC Code
Description


8743
Public relations services


7311
Advertising agencies


7336
Commercial art and graphic design


7999
Amusement and recreation services, not elsewhere classified





Officers and Directors



Title
Name
Age
TitleDate
StartDate


Chief Accounting Officer
BeataLysik








General Information



Number of Employees:
10
 (As of 12/31/2013) 


Outstanding Shares:
3,794,593
 (As of 3/31/2016) 


Stock Exchange:
WAR
















Copyright © 2017 CreditRiskMonitor.com (Ticker: CRMZ).  
All rights reserved.     

By using this website, you accept the Terms of Use Agreement. 
Fundamental financial data concerning public companies may be provided by Thomson Reuters (click for restrictions)

Thursday, August 03, 2017




SITE MAP | ABOUT US | DIRECTORY | STOCK QUOTE: CRMZ | SIGN IN







 















LUIGI BORMIOLI - Luigi Bormioli















































































































LuigiBormioli.com is a subsidiary of


  search
my account
cart
 


















 














Shop Mixology CollectionInnovativeStemless DesignShop T-Glass CollectionThe Authentic
Craft Beer  ExperienceShop Birrateque CollectionCanning, Preserving& ServingShop Lock Eat CollectionTastethe DifferenceShop Vinea Collection
 



 
 
 













FREE Shipping



in the continental U.S. 


 
 






|






 
 






25 YEAR Guarantee



We stand behind the exceptional quality of our product 


 
 











WINE





Wine glasses that satisfy the palates of the most discerning connoisseurs.
 




View All Wine Collections




 
 






 


Shop Atelier Collection



 


 


Shop Vinea Collection



 


 


Shop Magnifico Collection



 















 
 













ITALIAN CRAFTED | AUTHENTIC | DISTINCTIVE



Traditional Italian craftsmanship, distinctive design, high-tech manufacturing and passion for innovation are the spirit and legacy of Luigi Bormioli 


 
 











BAR





Bar glasses for cocktails that are always in fashion.
 




View All Bar Collections




 
 






 


Shop Bach Collection



 


 


Shop Precious Glass Collection



 


 


Shop Veronese On The Rocks Collection



 















 
 













HIGH-TECH | INNOVATIVE



A passionate pursuit of perfection blazes a bold trail with industry leading new-age glassmaking technologies 


 
 











BEER





Beer glasses designed for every craft beer lover.
 




View All Beer Collections




 
 






 


Shop Birrateque Collection



 


 


Shop Crescendo Collection



 


 


Shop Michelangelo Collection



 















 
 













BREAK RESISTANT | ULTRA CLEAR



Luigi Bormioli provides the world with Italian glassware of superior style, quality and performance 


 
 











SERVE & STORE





Glassware for storing and serving your best creations.
 




View All Serve & Store Collections




 
 






 


Shop Lock Eat Collection



 


 


Shop Michelangelo Collection



 


 


Shop Precious Glass Collection



 















 
 













PERSONALIZATION | CUSTOMIZATION



Add a personal touch to your glassware 


 
 











EVERYDAY





Everyday drinking glasses to set your table in style.
 




View All Everyday Collections




 
 






 


Shop Thermic Collection



 


 


Shop Prezioso Blue Collection



 


 


Shop Sublime Collection



 















 
 









 





 
 
 


 









 












                                    SON.hyx                                












                                    sparkx                                












                                    Titanium Reinforced                                












                                    Sensory Analysis                                












                                    Eco-Friendly                                












                                    25 Year Guarantee                                










 
 


 


 












Pin It on Pinterest






































Lessons From the School of Inattention: Magnifico (2003)


















Lessons From the School of Inattention




Oggs' Movie Thoughts











Monday, December 26, 2011





Magnifico (2003)











Magnifico (Maryo J. de los Reyes, 2003)


Curiously snubbed by the Metro Manila Film Festival during the same year the festival had films like Boy Vinarao’s Hula Mo... Huli Ko, Tony Reyes’ Lastikman and Enrico Quizon’s Home Along da Riber competing for the top plum, Maryo J. De los Reyes’ Magnifico was eventually released the following year to much critical recognition. Unfortunately, the film failed miserably in the box office. Nonetheless, the film, despite its very traditional filmmaking style, was way ahead of its time. In a way, it preceded the independent films of today in the sense that the story, more than the famous actors and actresses that lend their names and talent to the film, was the very vehicle that drove the film to acclaim. However, its unsuccessful local commercial run also preceded the mostly unsuccessful attempts of today’s independent films to break into mass consciousness.

Written by Michiko Yamamoto, the film is about the titular young boy (then newcomer Jiro Manio) who attempts to give his ailing grandmother (Gloria Romero) a decent funeral. Along with his best friend, he naively goes around town, talking to various personalities or finding ways to earn money, to piece together his grandmother’s funeral, from the coffin that he constructs from the extra plywood he gathered from the local crafts factory to the actual lot wherein his grandmother would be buried.

Yamamoto crafts an entire town populated with quirky individuals with realistic intentions and motivations. Gerry, Magnifico’s father (Albert Martinez) who works as a carpenter working for the local crafts factory, seems to be content with his family and their modest lifestyle. Edna (Lorna Tolentino), Magnifico’s mother who is mostly left in the house to take care of both her sick mother-in-law and her daughter (Isabella de Leon) who is suffering from cerebral palsy, takes her lot in life with a lot less of her husband’s optimism. Magnifico’s elder brother, Miong (Danilo Barrios) has just returned home from Manila after losing his scholarship and is now trying to court the daughter (Girlie Sevilla) of the factory owner (Tonton Gutierrez) in an attempt to escape his family’s fate.

Around town are a bevy of similarly complicated lives. Domeng (Mark Gil), the town’s bus driver, still morose and mourning months after his mother’s demise, is oblivious to the charms of Cristy (Cherry Pie Picache), the town’s primary source of gossip and as a result, the rival of Tessie (Amy Austria). Ka Doring (Celia Rodriguez), the owner of the town’s lone funeral parlor, has turned into the town’s laughing stock because of her seemingly incurable hoarse speaking voice.

De Los Reyes’ directs with precision, making sure that each character adds up to the emotional heft of the story. Although brimming with acting talents, he never allows any of the supporting cast to overshadow Magnifico or his younger sister, whose heart-warming interactions turn out to be the centrepiece of this finely tuned drama. Lutgardo Labad’s beautifully composed score is probably one of the very few in recent Philippine cinema that is truly memorable and hummable. It is quiet and subdued at times and swells whenever necessary, allowing the film to sink deep into the hearts of its audience. Magnifico is a masterfully orchestrated tearjerker. Each of its individual elements are weaved perfectly to create an emotionally rousing experience that never feels slight or ill-conceived.

Magnifico is that rare children’s film that tackles mortality, the inevitability of death. It buffers the seriousness of its subject matter with levity and humor, allowing the children to create for the film an atmosphere of endearing innocence amidst the drollness of the affairs of the adults.

By portraying life as a colorful tapestry of relationships affected by small acts that are fuelled by good intentions, it emphasizes its value while underlining its fragility. It is hardly an empty product that exploits Filipino sensitivity for shocks and tears, like the many melodramas that populate the Metro Manila Film Festival that unfairly neglected it because of its lack of commercial appeal. It is genuinely moving, as it makes you familiar with its characters, allowing you to understand instead of merely witness their virtues, flaws, and humble ambitions. Undoubtedly, Magnifico is a film that will be remembered far longer than any of the films that made it to that miserably misinformed film festival that year.





(Cross-published in Lagarista.)













Posted by
Oggs Cruz


at
12:11 AM
























Labels:
2003 Films,
Lagarista,
Maryo J. de los Reyes,
Philippines










1 comment:






JC
said...



I haven't seen the film for five years already, but I remember how touching, funny, and heartbreaking the film was.I'm excited to hear your review for SRR 13! :)))





8:01 PM











Post a Comment











Newer Post


Older Post

Home




Subscribe to:
Post Comments (Atom)








Blog Archive








        ► 
      



2014

(26)





        ► 
      



July

(4)







        ► 
      



June

(4)







        ► 
      



May

(2)







        ► 
      



April

(6)







        ► 
      



March

(4)







        ► 
      



February

(4)







        ► 
      



January

(2)









        ► 
      



2013

(40)





        ► 
      



December

(2)







        ► 
      



November

(9)







        ► 
      



October

(4)







        ► 
      



September

(4)







        ► 
      



August

(4)







        ► 
      



July

(5)







        ► 
      



June

(4)







        ► 
      



April

(1)







        ► 
      



March

(2)







        ► 
      



February

(1)







        ► 
      



January

(4)









        ► 
      



2012

(57)





        ► 
      



December

(8)







        ► 
      



October

(5)







        ► 
      



September

(6)







        ► 
      



August

(6)







        ► 
      



July

(9)







        ► 
      



June

(6)







        ► 
      



May

(2)







        ► 
      



April

(1)







        ► 
      



March

(1)







        ► 
      



February

(7)







        ► 
      



January

(6)









        ▼ 
      



2011

(70)





        ▼ 
      



December

(14)

Ang Panday 2 (2011)
Yesterday, Today and Tomorrow (2011)
Shake, Rattle and Roll 13 (2011)
Manila Kingpin: The Asiong Salonga Story (2011)
Segunda Mano (2011)
Magnifico (2003)
Bring the Macho Back, etc.
For Y'ur Height Only (1981)
Sa Kanto ng Ulap at Lupa (2011)
Alkitrang Dugo (1976)
The Road (2011)
Won't Last a Day Without You (2011)
Six Degrees of Separation from Lilia Cuntapay (201...
Memories of Overdevelopment (1980-2011)








        ► 
      



November

(7)







        ► 
      



October

(5)







        ► 
      



September

(3)







        ► 
      



August

(8)







        ► 
      



July

(9)







        ► 
      



June

(4)







        ► 
      



May

(6)







        ► 
      



April

(4)







        ► 
      



March

(1)







        ► 
      



February

(6)







        ► 
      



January

(3)









        ► 
      



2010

(63)





        ► 
      



December

(6)







        ► 
      



November

(7)







        ► 
      



October

(4)







        ► 
      



September

(4)







        ► 
      



August

(5)







        ► 
      



July

(7)







        ► 
      



June

(5)







        ► 
      



May

(7)







        ► 
      



April

(9)







        ► 
      



March

(4)







        ► 
      



February

(3)







        ► 
      



January

(2)









        ► 
      



2009

(54)





        ► 
      



December

(6)







        ► 
      



November

(5)







        ► 
      



October

(5)







        ► 
      



September

(4)







        ► 
      



August

(4)







        ► 
      



July

(10)







        ► 
      



June

(3)







        ► 
      



May

(3)







        ► 
      



April

(3)







        ► 
      



March

(4)







        ► 
      



February

(4)







        ► 
      



January

(3)









        ► 
      



2008

(86)





        ► 
      



December

(5)







        ► 
      



November

(4)







        ► 
      



October

(9)







        ► 
      



September

(8)







        ► 
      



August

(7)







        ► 
      



July

(11)







        ► 
      



June

(6)







        ► 
      



May

(7)







        ► 
      



April

(5)







        ► 
      



March

(8)







        ► 
      



February

(8)







        ► 
      



January

(8)









        ► 
      



2007

(188)





        ► 
      



December

(10)







        ► 
      



November

(13)







        ► 
      



October

(12)







        ► 
      



September

(2)







        ► 
      



August

(20)







        ► 
      



July

(24)







        ► 
      



June

(21)







        ► 
      



May

(15)







        ► 
      



April

(18)







        ► 
      



March

(16)







        ► 
      



February

(16)







        ► 
      



January

(21)









        ► 
      



2006

(176)





        ► 
      



December

(17)







        ► 
      



November

(21)







        ► 
      



October

(28)







        ► 
      



September

(37)







        ► 
      



August

(50)







        ► 
      



July

(23)









        ► 
      



2005

(1)





        ► 
      



December

(1)

















Little Lessons from the School of Inattention

Oggs Cruz's takes on films that may or may not evolve into full articles:Last 5 Films:May Minamahal (Loving Somebody, Jose Javier Reyes, 1993)Inside Job (Charles Ferguson, 2010)Love in a Puff (Pang Ho-cheung, 2010)Transformers: Dark of the Moon (Michael Bay, 2011)Green Lantern (Martin Campbell, 2011)Click here for Links of Other Films Mini-reviewed:














About Me





Oggs Cruz


Lawyer-Critic

View my complete profile











More From Oggs...


List of All Films Reviewed
List of Filipino Films Reviewed
My Life as an Ogg
Oggs' Repository of Ideas (my former film blog)












Articles, Discussions, and Other Stuff


2013: Philippine Cinema
2012: Philippine Cinema
Philippine Film Awards, in a Rotten Nutshell
Celso Ad. Castillo (1943-2012)
Marilou Diaz-Abaya (1955-2012)
In Defense of the Status Quo
Of Blind Items and Critics
Dolphy's Last Hurrahs
Mario O'Hara (1946-2012)
Three Decades of Philippine Shorts
Dolphy, National Comedian
Cinemalaya Resignation Letter
2011: Philippine Cinema
2011: Philippine Shorts
Bring the Macho Back, etc.
Cartas de la Soledad: An Interview with Gutierrez Mangansakan II
When Silver is Better than Gold: Silvershorts
Observations from a Semi-Starry, Starry Night
Chris Martinez: The Man Behind the Golden Septic Tank
The Short Films of Kidlat Tahimik
The Actors and the Alchemist
A Woman in This World of Men
Evolution of a Filipino Film Lover
2010: Philippine Cinema
Redemption of a Decade in Philippine Cinema
On Lav Diaz
Aftermath
The Movie Experience I Can't Forget
A Short Article about the Films of the Indio Nacional
Long Live Juan Tamad!
Palito (1934-2010)
Ateneo Video Open 11: Short Narrative Finalists
2009: Highlights in Film
Johnny Delgado (1948-2009)
To Kill a Myna Bird (Spring Awakening)
Alexis Tioseco (1981-2009)
2008 .MOV International Digital Film Festival
Cinematic Highlights of 2007
Filipino Shorts of 2007
Censoring the Censors
Philippine Cinema on the Verge of Redemption
CinoMalaya?












Recent Comments

↑ Grab This Widget











Filipino Film Blogs










All That I Love I View Over Once and Once Again




Bliss (Jerrold Tarog, 2017)



                      -
                    

[image: Image may contain: 1 person, text]

*Bliss *is a true sleeper. It is a satirical, horrifying take on obsession 
and predation in local cinema. Filmma...


1 day ago












Another Sani Day









2015 in TV



                      -
                    

Bear with me on this. I love lists, and I used to do it A LOT. But the last 
3 years or so, I got really really lazy with anything that has to do with 
blogg...


1 year ago












Auditoire









Note 4: Nonface, Interlude, Lav Diaz and Time



                      -
                    


*The face withheld - a secret.*



*1. *

*The Nonface in Class Picture1*

*[This article was published in Kino Punch (Issue 3), U.P. Cinema's Film 
Critiqu...


1 year ago












Bamboo Gods and Bionic Boys









SEARCH FOR WENG WENG: Week #2 update!



                      -
                    



Dear friends and colleagues,



As you may have heard, I'm currently running a crowdfunding campaign to 
finish my THE SEARCH FOR WENG WENG documentary - 
...


4 years ago












Brainstorms from the Shower




Violator (2014).



                      -
                    

VIOLATOR – Eduardo Dayao Violator (2014) is a fuck-you to contemporary 
cinema’s plethora of transgressions. It is director Eduardo Dayao’s middle 
finger ge...


4 months ago












Chapter 82




Career Advice (2)



                      -
                    



*“So diba, gusto kong mag-DOP. Haha kaso, di ako magaling, di pako ma-boka, 
but I think I have good taste and the gap between my taste and the quality 
of...


2 months ago












Closely Watched Frames









TAKLUB (Brillante Mendoza, 2015)



                      -
                    




Not quite so simple to work on a project with a measure of autonomy when 
forces of influence must be looking over your shoulder, presumably 
kibitzing, p...


1 year ago












Concentrated Nonsense (cinema edition)




Dear Film Development Council of the Philippines



                      -
                    

You have the mandate to start the National Film Archive. I have heard that 
your first priority project in relation to archiving is the digitization of 
some...


7 years ago












Critic After Dark









Dunkirk (Christopher Nolan 2017)



                      -
                    



*Brexit*

Christopher Nolan's *latest* deals for the first time with an actual event, 
massive in scale and complex in nature--the mass exodus of over 300,...


2 hours ago












film, eyeballs, brain




Sleepy Hollow: “John Doe” (2013).



                      -
                    

“I think routine is a thing of the past for us,” Ichabod Crane says at the 
start of last week’s episode, “John Doe.” You can say that again. There’s 
nothin...


3 years ago












Kawts Kamote




The Last Post Ever About "Indie"



                      -
                    



For the past decade, the so-called Independent scene has been mostly 
dependent to financing bodies run by almost the same people who almost 
serve the sam...


1 year ago












Lilok Pelikula




Dispatches from ToFarm Film Festival (Part 2)



                      -
                    

HIGH TIDE (Tara Illenberger) High Tide seems to be the only film from the 
lineup that shows the least struggle in submitting to the festival’s 
thematic req...


2 weeks ago












Make Me Blush









Philippine Industry Report - The Best Films and Performances of 2016



                      -
                    


*There was* a time when the ordinary Filipino’s favourite and most 
affordable past time was movie watching. People could clear their minds and 
get lost in...


6 months ago












Me Likes Art









Done with Cinemalaya X



                      -
                    



Break muna ako sa latest CinemalayaX scandal. This year has a superb 
lineup, though I was only able to watch 11 films (the number does not 
include all th...


2 years ago












Michael Mirasol - The Flipcritic






                      -
                    

















Pelikula Tumblr




I Am Trying to Break Your Heart
Vinny Tagle on Eternal Sunshine...



                      -
                    



*I Am Trying to Break Your Heart*

Vinny Tagle on *Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind *(2004, Michel Gondry)

*In celebration of Pelikula Tumblr’s fifth...


2 years ago












Pelikula, atbp.









THE GOLD BIKINI (1967)



                      -
                    

Click on images to enlarge
THE GOLD BIKINI
Released April 14, 1967 / Dalisay Theater
Producer:  Lea Productions
Director:  Gerry de Leon
Stars:  Ray Marcos, ...


18 hours ago












Piling Piling Pelikula









ALTERED STATE



                      -
                    








Almost three years ago,  I dragged myself out of the soft bed at the Hotel 
Palacky in Karlovy Vary earlier than I should have  and, without sufficien...


4 months ago












Pinoy Rebyu




The 50 Best Filipino Films of the 21st Century



                      -
                    

A few days after resigning from the Metro Manila Film Festival Executive 
Committee, film critic Rolando Tolentino tweeted, “Ang pelikula di naalaala 
dahil ...


1 week ago












Pixelated Popcorn









Favorite Foreign Films of 2014



                      -
                    


 
*Special Mention:*
The Tale of the Princess Kaguya, dir. Isao Takahata
 
20) The One I Love, dir. Charlie McDowell
 
19) Labor Day, dir. Jason Reitman
 
1...


2 years ago












Sari-Saring Sineng Pinoy






                      -
                    

















Something to Sing About









Ha Ha Ha (South Korea, 2010)



                      -
                    


Because last Saturday's drink up was strange. "Drinking down memory lane," 
a drunken text message, slurred across time (the flooding of memory) and 
space ...


6 years ago












Taga-Ilog Special Presents









Ilang Tala sa mga Paborito Kong Short Film sa 2015



                      -
                    



Paborito kong excuse ang “maling audience” kapag nanonood ako ng mga 
experimental film sa Pinas. Gusto ko ang mga pelikulang pinapag-isip ako 
pero hesita...


1 year ago












The Bakla Review




New Trailer: Boitoi: Pera Ang Dahilan Ng Pusong Sugatan



                      -
                    



3 years ago












The Search For Weng Weng









The Two Degrees of Weng Weng



                      -
                    


*SIX DEGREES OF KEVIN BACON? PFFFFFT! WELCOME TO THE TWO DEGREES OF WENG 
WENG*

Everyone - and I mean EVERYone - in the Philippine film industry is just 
t...


5 months ago












Video 48









THE SEVENTIES # 693: LOLITA RODRIGUEZ, LILIA DIZON, EDDIE GARCIA, MARIO O' HARA AND HILDA KORONEL & INTRODUCING CHRISTOPHER DE LEON IN LINO BROCKA'S "TINIMBANG KA NGUNIT KULANG" (1974)



                      -
                    



*"Tinimbang Ka Ngunit Kulang" (1974)*
*CineManila Corporation*
*Release Date May 30, 1974*
*Screenplay Mario O' Hara*
*Cinematography Jose Batac, Jr.*
*Mus...


15 hours ago












Viewer Discretion




Not Another Manileño-Kids-Trooping-to-a-Party Video



                      -
                    

Turn It Well Artist: Up Dharma Down Director: Caloy Soliongco Cast: Paul 
Diaz, Dee Jae Paeste, Gino Jose, Martin Antunez, Haizel Fernando 2012 I 
love Up Dh...


4 years ago












Visual Velocity









Snowpiercer (2013)



                      -
                    



Ever wonder what it's like having the entire human race jammed in one 
cramp, perpetually-running locomotive? Korean filmmaker Bong Joon-ho shows 
how craz...


3 years ago












Young Critics Circle Film Desk






                      -
                    























Film Blogs From Elsewhere










100 films




Second Verse, Same as the First



                      -
                    

I'm bringing this back from the dead, but don't get too excited. 

I was using Squarespace for a bit, but I kind of hated it. I'm mostly using 
this as a pla...


10 months ago












A Nutshell Review









re:solve / 决议案 Trailer



                      -
                    

There's a release date! And a new trailer to accompany the one month wait 
to its debut. Touted as Singapore's first police crime thriller, 
anticipation and...


3 years ago












Bohemian Cinema






                      -
                    

















Celluloid Breakfast









THE BITTER TEARS OF PETRA VON KANT (GERMANY/1972/RAINER WERNER FASSBINDER)



                      -
                    

 Perhaps the most acclaimed film in Rainer Werner Fassbinder’s inimitable 
oeuvre, *The Bitter Tears of Petra von Kant* deals with issues of obsession 
and j...


5 years ago












Coffee coffee and more coffee




Me & You



                      -
                    

Io e te Bernardo Bertolucci - 2012 Artificial Eye BD Region B Is this the 
last film by Bernardo Bertolucci? It certainly looks that way. And yes, 
after a c...


2 days ago












Conversations on Ghibli









Photos: Kiki's Delivery Service



                      -
                    






Some screenshots of Kiki's Delivery Service on Blu-Ray. The picture quality 
is astoundingly good and a big upgrade over DVD, just like all of the 
Stud...


4 days ago












Dave Kehr




Fade Out/Fade In



                      -
                    



My final home video column for the New York Times is here. I get to go out 
on the greatest, John Ford, thanks to a five-film box set from TCM and Sony 
fe...


3 years ago












Edward Copeland on Film









Memories of Edward Copeland



                      -
                    



For a time at my home blog, *Thrilling Days of Yesteryear*, I meticulously 
documented the passings of people in the entertainment industry in the form 
of...


1 year ago












Elusive Lucidity









Gone



                      -
                    



3 years ago












Faster than instant noodles






                      -
                    

















Film Experience Blog




Meet Joe Link



                      -
                    



good morning!

• /Film amazing story behind that funny "he's a friend from work" line in 
the forthcoming 
*Thor: Ragnarok*• Variety talks to five members ...


3 hours ago












Film Journey






                      -
                    

















Film Studies For Free









Richly Resourceful! On B.Ruby Rich's Work, plus A Roundup of Recent Open Access Screen Studies Items



                      -
                    

 The SENSES of an ENDING from Catherine Grant

The above video treats the ending of Lucrecia Martel's *La niña santa / The 
Holy Girl *(2004), using insights...


1 month ago












Flickhead






                      -
                    

















Girish









The Disenchantments of "La La Land"



                      -
                    



Damien Chazelle’s *La La Land* has turned out to be a fascinatingly 
divisive film. It has enchanted thousands and swept up a record 14 Oscar 
nominations....


6 months ago












GreenCine Daily






                      -
                    

















Hell On Frisco Bay









The Anita Monga Era at the San Francisco Silent Film Festival



                      -
                    


As I find myself with less and less of the time and (perhaps more 
importantly) the ability to direct my focus away from the world's turmoil 
to write about...


2 months ago












Kung Fu Cult Cinema






                      -
                    

















Landscape Suicide









25 of the 21st century



                      -
                    




-


This blog is basically dead. I hadn't intended to retire it but life moves 
on and Blogger feels like a pretty outdated platform these days. I 
certai...


5 weeks ago












Last Night with Riviera




Sydney Film Festival 2014



                      -
                    

*SYDNEY FILM FESTIVAL 2014*

As the programmer of the Sydney Film Festival Hub, I live in Town Hall 
during the Festival, and don't get to see many films. Bu...


3 years ago












Lessons of Darkness




Looper (2012): A-



                      -
                    

Fulfilling the ambitions of his debut Brick, Rian Johnson crafts a 
scintillating neo-noir gem of existential quandaries and inescapable 
fatalism with Loope...


4 years ago












Like Anna Karina's Sweater




Ich werde ein Berliner (Or: From Liberty to Victory)



                      -
                    

"Berlin ist eine Stadt, verdammt dazu, ewig zu werden, niemals zu sein" 
("Berlin is a city condemned forever to becoming and never to being.") -- 
Karl Sche...


7 years ago












Limitless Cinema




NA WEWE



                      -
                    

*NA WEWE (2010, Ivan Goldschmidt, Belgium/Burundi, short film, A+30)*

*หนังสั้นเรื่องนี้เคยเข้าชิงรางวัลออสการ์ 
หนังเล่าเรื่องของรถตู้ที่บรรทุกผู้โดยสารหลา...


1 day ago












Mango Grove









favorite films



                      -
                    

Notes.
Bumped to the top of my blog for easy access.
20 films. Chronological. 1 film per director. I have given my top 5 special 
pictures. I do plan to expa...


6 years ago












Not Coming to a Theater Near You




Recommended Cinema for July 30-August 05, 2017



                      -
                    

This calendar is a new addition to NotComing.com, and is updated each 
Sunday with suggested screenings for the upcoming week. Currently, the 
calendar conta...


4 days ago












Observations on Film Art and Film Art




DUNKIRK Part 1: Straight to the good stuff



                      -
                    

Kristin here: All kinds of spoilers ahead. The last time I wrote about a 
Christopher Nolan film on this blog, I was defending the unusual use of 
protracted...


20 hours ago












Only The Cinema




New Home



                      -
                    

My writing – about music, not film, at the moment – can currently be found 
at my new blog: reddy brown objects.


2 years ago












Pearls from the Cinematic Garden






                      -
                    

















Radiator Heaven









The Larry Sanders Show



                      -
                    

 

*BLOGGERS NOTE:* This post originally appeared on the Wonders in the Dark 
blog for their Top 80 Greatest Television Shows.

In the 1980s and 1990s, late ...


5 days ago












Reverse Shot




April 2015 Film Preview



                      -
                    

Summer blockbuster season is just around the corner, but there's no need to 
wait until then to see a great movie. April brings us a wide variety of 
women-c...


2 years ago












scanners






                      -
                    

















Screenville









Quantum of Solace - intro part 1



                      -
                    



4 years ago












Self-Styled Siren









Bad-Movie Double Feature



                      -
                    

A long time ago the Siren was asked in the comments to a post on this here 
blog whether or not she had seen *The Legend of Lylah Clare*. And she said 
no, a...


1 day ago












Sergio Leone and the Infield Fly Rule









WILD, DANGEROUS, IMPERFECT, WOUNDED GRANDEUR: 18 DOUBLE FEATURES ABOUT AMERICA



                      -
                    


The United States is “my country, right or wrong,” of course, and I 
consider myself a patriotic person, but I’ve never felt that patriotism 
meant blind fe...


4 weeks ago












Some Came Running




Encounters With Great Recording Of The 20th Century #4: Lou Reed, "The RCA And Arista Album Collection" (Released and acquired October 2016)



                      -
                    

For Scott Lemieux and Brian Koppelman. I was a very poorly socialized 
child. After my incredibly obese toddlerhood, I assumed the more or less 
regular dime...


1 day ago












Southeast Asian Film Studies Institute









Our Architecture Magazine sells for $ 12 on Amazon.com!



                      -
                    

Check it out on the Amazon website.Filed under: Uncategorized


4 years ago












Spectacular Attractions




Breaking Down The Great Wall



                      -
                    

Even if you live outside China and have not yet been able to see The Great 
Wall for yourself, you’ve probably overheard or contributed to one or both 
of th...


6 months ago












Supposed Aura









Bachelor Flat



                      -
                    

The chaos/choreography of things hidden and revealed :



















[Images from Frank Tashlin's Bachelor Flat (1962).]


6 years ago












The Bourne Cinema Conspiracy









Tale of Cinema 극장전 (Hong Sang-soo, 2005)



                      -
                    




(This post is in conjunction with the Museum of the Moving Image's 
retrospective, "Tales of Cinema: The Films of Hong Sang-soo," screening 
through June ...


1 year ago












The Daily Notebook




A Place of Hard Labor: Peter Nestler on MUBI



                      -
                    

*MUBI's retrospective on filmmaker Peter Nestler, *A Vision of Resistance*, 
presented as part of a collaboration with the Film Society of Lincoln 
Center, i...


1 week ago












The Evening Class









SFFF60—MICHAEL HAWLEY EXPLORES THE BIG NIGHTS, AWARDS & TRIBUTES, AND SPECIAL EVENTS



                      -
                    


The first order of business at last week's press conference for the 60th 
San Francisco International Film Festival (SFIFF) was addressing the issue 
of reb...


4 months ago












The House Next Door






                      -
                    

















The Moviezzz Blog






                      -
                    

















The Seventh Art




Favorite Films Of 2015



                      -
                    

2015 was a fine period for me. I went to the Mumbai Film Festival, 
something that I’d been meaning to do for some time now. I could also go to 
Experimenta ...


1 year ago












Twitch




Fantasia 2017 Review: TEIICHI: BATTLE OF SUPREME HIGH Mixes High School Politics With Hilarious Comedy



                      -
                    

 Kaitei College, once a naval academy, it now educates and trains the 
future leaders of the country. If you want a future in politics in the 
country of Jap...


10 minutes ago












Twitter / theauteurs






                      -
                    

















Unspoken Cinema




I always liked it slow (Leonard Cohen)



                      -
                    

I’m slowing down the tuneI never liked it fastYou want to get there soonI 
want to get there lastIt’s not because I’m oldIt’s not the life I ledI 
always lik...


2 years ago












Wise Kwai's Thai Film Journal









Out to pasture



                      -
                    



Covering Thai cinema and living in Thailand for the past decade or so has 
been an illuminating experience, one that I'm not sure whether I'll regret.

I s...


1 year ago












World Weird Cinema









THE END OF WORLDWEIRD CINEMA?!? And the latest from Mondo Macabro!!



                      -
                    

So I'm sure most of you have noticed that there hasn't been much going on 
here of late. In fact, it's been more than four months since my last post. 
My tha...


6 years ago


















More Film Stuff...


Click the City Reviews (Philbert Ortiz Dy)
Criticine
DVD Beaver
Jonathan Rosenbaum's Website
Passion for Cinema
Pinoydvd Forums
Senses of Cinema
Strictly Film School












Other Blogs


Bitter Grace (Ayn Marie Dimaya)
Crooked Through (Chrisgel Cruz)
Digital Buryong (Chard Bolisay)
Gibbs Cadiz
Is It Safe? (Dodo Dayao)
Jessica Rules the Universe (Jessica Zafra)
Lightning Fast Lady Killer K (Quark Henares)
Perelandran Chronicles (Rev Cruz)
Spring Roll (Lilit Reyes)
Spy in the Sandwich (Ian Casocot)
Teh Reel Me (Shinji Manlangit)
Vincula (Ted Te)
Writing by Amir (Amir Muhammad)












Followers



















The Ad Board


















Other Tools









Enter your search terms








Web


oggsmoggs.blogspot.com


Submit search form











- 

DAILYMOVIEGUIDE.COM



 netizens have visited this site.


























Magnifico Enterprises - 首頁 | Facebook











Facebook電子郵件或電話密碼忘記帳號？註冊首頁貼文相片關於社群建立粉絲專頁社群查看全部64 人說這讚64 個人正在追蹤關於查看全部產品／服務用戶64 個讚更多大家都按讚的專頁The Most Sweet Gamer公眾人物Laurel mates學校FC TILE DEPOT Lemery零售公司中文(台灣) · English (US) · Español · Português (Brasil) · Français (France)隱私政策 · 使用條款 · 廣告 · Ad Choices · Cookie · 更多 Facebook © 2017貼文Magnifico Enterprises 更新了封面相片。 · 7月25日 6:55 · Magnifico Enterprises 分享了 Magnifico ARTS T-shirt printing,tarpulin printing,signboard,etc. 的貼文。 · 6月9日 · 還有 6 張Magnifico ARTS T-shirt printing,tarpulin printing,signboard,etc. 新增了 9 張相片。 · 6月9日 · Philippines Zamboanga Peninsula Dipolog City · Family/School Reunion Tshirts for as low as Php120 each (tshirt with print). LOWEST PRICE Plus Free Shipping Fee for bulk order. We also supply couple/family ts⋯⋯hirts and any customized designs. Resellers are welcome. Pm us for inquiries. Location: Dipolog city We ship nationwide thru JRS or LBC 更多顯示全部相片顯示全部貼文Magnifico Enterprises 分享了貼文。 · 4月2日 · 還有 11 張Magnifico Enterprises 新增了 14 張相片。 · 3月11日 · We accept T-shirt printing  For more inquiries  Visit: Magnifico enterprises atbang sa cenro office  Purok 7,sta. Isabel Dipolog city⋯⋯ Kung naa mo sa layu andam gihapon mi Modawat pm lang ang pattern ug ang bayad bisan asa mga remittance.  We deliver nationwide.... #bus shipping Jr's or Lbc 更多Magnifico Enterprises 新增了 21 張相片 — 與 Judyline Acedo 和 Misty Agustin · 3月11日 · Tarpaulin printing.  Pm for more details Contact:09202073598還有 18 張Magnifico Enterprises 新增了 14 張相片。 · 3月11日 · We accept T-shirt printing  For more inquiries  Visit: Magnifico enterprises atbang sa cenro office  Purok 7,sta. Isabel Dipolog city⋯⋯ Kung naa mo sa layu andam gihapon mi Modawat pm lang ang pattern ug ang bayad bisan asa mga remittance.  We deliver nationwide.... #bus shipping Jr's or Lbc 更多還有 11 張Magnifico Enterprises 更新了封面相片。 · 3月11日 · Magnifico Enterprises 新增了 10 張相片。 · 3月11日 · We accept tshirt printing #layouting #screen processing #tarpulin printing Located in front cenro office sta. Isabel, Dipolog city contact:09202073598還有 7 張Magnifico Enterprises 更新了封面相片。 · 3月11日 · Magnifico Enterprises 更新了大頭貼照。 · 3月11日 · 查看更多




















Magnifico Vertical Radiator Brushed  (H)630 mm (W)300 mm
























































































Menu













 


Magnifico Vertical Radiator Brushed  (H)630 mm (W)300 mm£550.00

Click to see sale price


SKU: 1218864_BQ
Categories: General Household, Heating & Cooling, Home & Garden, Radiators
Tag: B & Q





Description



Description

 – 
Magnifico Vertical Radiator Brushed  (H)630 mm (W)300 mm.Discover our stylish range of high quality designer radiators  specially developed to blend in with the interior of your home. A great designer radiator should match the style of interior  whether that be minimal and understated  an ultra-modern contemporary  or a more timeless traditional style. All of our designer radiators have been crafted to a high quality  and many feature state-of-the-art technology.

 


Related products


Clean Seal High Performance Sealant
£20.00
Click to see sale price

Cooke & Lewis Farleigh Tall Glazed Door (W)500mm
£29.10
Click to see sale price

Cooke & Lewis Farleigh Standard Door (W)400mm
£19.50
Click to see sale price



 










 


Top Rated Products


 Hamilton Prestige Finely Tipped Paint Brush (W)1 "

£3.91


 Home of Colour Garden Colour - Soft Fern - 2.5L

£12.00


 Rentokil Fast Action Mouse Killer

£9.99


 Maun Snipe Nose Plier Smooth Jaw

£29.60


 VonHaus Body Fat Scales

£14.99


 Kids Waterproof & Anti Allergy Single Mattress with Non Storage Diva

£229.00


 4 Panel Shaker Oak Veneer Internal Door  (H)1981mm (W)686mm

£100.00


 Chunky 2 Column Radiator  White (W)440mm (H)1884mm

£182.00


 Lesser & Pavey Leonardo Cockerel And Hen Retro Design Fine China Butter Dish

£12.99


 Portmeirion Vintage Kelloggs Giant Size Mug 0.45L

£11.20
Product Tagsaluminium
AVF
B & Q
B&Q
Black
Blooma
Blue
Brown
chrome
clear
Colours
Cooke & Lewis
Cream
Crown
Diall
Draper
Dulux
Faithfull
Farrow & Ball
Form
green
Grey
Happy Beds
Homebase
IT Kitchens
metal
Multi
natural
Oak Furniture King
Plumbsure
Powerful Vision Ltd.
Red
Robert Dyas
Ronseal
Silver
Stanley
steel
Tesco
Tesco Direct
The Rug House
Trend
White
Wilko
Wilko.com
wooden





































































